Mississippi, session 2026, HB1281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Office of the State Auditor shall perform a comparative review of the legislative appropriations to the state's two (2) land grant institutions, Alcorn State University and Mississippi State University, for a period of fifty (50) years commencing with fiscal year 1976.  For each year, the State Auditor shall determine the total funding appropriated to each university from the various appropriations made to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and directly to Alcorn State University and Mississippi State University for the support of specific programs at the respective institutions. (2)  Before December 1, 2026, the State Auditor shall prepare and submit a detailed report of the comparative review to the members of the Appropriations Committees of the House of Representatives and Senate and to the Clerk of the House and Secretary of the Senate to be made available, upon request, to any legislator.  For each fiscal year from 1976 to 2026, the report must include the total funding appropriated to Alcorn State University and Mississippi State University, disaggregated by the allocations to each institution in the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning general support appropriation bill and all other appropriations made to each institution in support of specific programs at or affiliated with the institution. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.